Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Societies
§ 26-29-226.
Reports.

Every society transacting business in this state shall annually, on or before March 1, unless for cause shown the time has been extended by the commissioner, file with the commissioner a true statement of its financial condition, transactions and affairs for the preceding calendar year and pay a two hundred fifty dollar ($250.00) filing fee. The statement shall be in general form and context as approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners for fraternal benefit societies and as supplemented by additional information required by the commissioner. The statement shall be completed pursuant to the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual. The commissioner may accept, for any society not domiciled in this state which is required to file any statement under this subsection, an electronic filing with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners meeting the requirements of this subsection as a filing with the commissioner.

As part of the annual statement herein required, each society shall, on or before March 1, file with the commissioner a valuation of its certificates in force on the immediately preceding December 31, provided the commissioner may, in his discretion for cause shown, extend the time for filing the valuation for not more than two (2) calendar months. The valuation shall be done in accordance with the standards specified in W.S.

26-29-225

. The valuation and underlying data shall be certified by a qualified actuary or, at the expense of the society, verified by the actuary of the department of insurance of the state of domicile of the society.

A society neglecting to file the annual statement in the form and within the time provided by this section shall forfeit one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each day during which such neglect continues, and upon notice by the commissioner to that effect, its authority to do business in this state shall cease while the default continues.

Chapter 3, article 3 of this code shall apply to every society transacting business in this state except to the extent that the commissioner determines that the nature of fraternal benefit societies render that chapter and article, or any portion thereof, clearly inappropriate.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1; 2000, ch. 30, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 1; 2004, ch. 14, § 2; 2007, ch. 44, § 2; 2016 ch. 24, § 2, effective March 3, 2016.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added the last sentence in (a).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “under this subsection” for “or valuation under this section” in (a).

The 2016 amendment

, added (d).

Laws 2016, ch. 24 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2016.

§ 26-29-227.
Annual license.

Societies which are now authorized to transact business in this state may continue business until February 28, 1990. The authority of those societies and all societies licensed under this chapter, may thereafter be renewed annually, but in all cases to terminate on the last day of the succeeding February. However, a license so issued shall continue in full force and effect until the new license is issued or specifically refused. For each license or renewal the society shall pay the commissioner two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00). A duly certified copy or duplicate of the license shall be prima facie evidence that the licensee is a fraternal benefit society within the meaning of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1; 2000, ch. 30, § 1.

§ 26-29-228.
Examination of societies.

The commissioner, or his designee, may examine any domestic, foreign or alien society transacting or applying for admission to transact business in this state in the same manner as authorized for examination of domestic, foreign or alien insurers. Requirements of notice and an opportunity to respond before findings are made public as provided in the laws regulating insurers shall also be applicable to the examination of societies.

The expense of each examination and of each valuation, including compensation and actual expense of examiners, shall be paid by the society examined or whose certificates are valued, upon statements furnished by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-229.
Foreign or alien society; admission.

No foreign or alien society shall transact business in this state without a license issued by the commissioner. Any foreign or alien society desiring admission to this state shall comply substantially with the requirements and limitations of this chapter applicable to domestic societies and may be licensed to transact business in this state upon filing with the commissioner:

A duly certified copy of its articles of incorporation;

A copy of its bylaws, certified by its secretary or corresponding officer;

A power of attorney to the commissioner as prescribed in W.S.

26-29-235

;

A statement of its business under oath of its president and secretary or corresponding officers in a form prescribed by the commissioner, duly verified by an examination made by the supervising insurance official of its home state or other state, territory, province or country, satisfactory to the commissioner of this state;

Certification from the proper official of its home state, territory, province or country that the society is legally incorporated and licensed to transact business therein;

Copies of its certificate forms;

A written statement showing that its assets are invested in accordance with the provisions of this chapter; and

Other information as the commissioner deems necessary.

Any foreign or alien society desiring admission to the state shall have the qualifications required of domestic societies organized under this chapter.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-230.
Injunction; liquidation; receivership of domestic society.

The commissioner shall at once provide written notification to a society when the commissioner upon investigation finds that a domestic society:

Has exceeded its powers;

Has failed to comply with any provision of this chapter;

Is not fulfilling its contracts in good faith;

Has a membership of less than four hundred (400) after an existence of one (1) year or more; or

Is conducting business fraudulently or in a manner hazardous to its members, creditors, the public or the business.

The commissioner shall notify the society of any deficiency specified in subsection (a) of this section and state in writing the reasons why he believes the deficiency exists. The commissioner shall at once issue a written notice to the society requiring that the deficiency be corrected. After the notice the society has thirty (30) days in which to comply with the commissioner’s request for correction, and if the society fails to comply, the commissioner shall notify the society of its findings of noncompliance and require the society to show cause on a date named why it should not be enjoined from carrying on any business until the violation complained of shall have been corrected, or why an action in quo warranto should not be commenced against the society.

If on that date the society does not present good and sufficient reasons why it should not be so enjoined or why such action should not be commenced, the commissioner may present the facts relating thereto to the attorney general who shall, if he deems the circumstances warrant, commence an action to enjoin the society from transacting business or in quo warranto.

If after a full hearing it appears that the society should be enjoined from transacting business or liquidated or a receiver appointed, the court shall enter the necessary order. No society enjoined under this subsection may do business until:

The commissioner finds that the violation complained of has been corrected;

The costs of the action have been paid by the society if the court finds that the society was in default as charged;

The court has dissolved its injunction; and

The commissioner has reinstated the certificate of authority.

If the court orders the society liquidated, it shall be enjoined from carrying on any further business, whereupon the receiver of the society shall proceed at once to take possession of the books, papers, money and other assets of the society and, under the direction of the court, proceed forthwith to close the affairs of the society and to distribute its funds to those entitled thereto.

No action under this section shall be recognized in any court of this state unless brought by the attorney general upon request of the commissioner. Whenever a receiver is to be appointed for a domestic society, the court shall appoint the commissioner as receiver.

The provisions of this section relating to hearing by the commissioner, action by the attorney general at the request of the commissioner, hearing by the court, injunction and receivership shall be applicable to a society which shall voluntarily determine to discontinue business.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-231.
Suspension, revocation or refusal of license of society.

The commissioner shall at once provide written notification to a society when the commissioner upon investigation finds that a society transacting or applying to transact business in this state:

Has exceeded its powers;

Has failed to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter;

Has become insolvent;

Is not fulfilling its contracts in good faith; or

Is conducting its business fraudulently or in a manner hazardous to its members or creditors or the public.

The commissioner shall notify the society of the deficiency as provided in subsection (a) of this section and state in writing the reasons why he believes the deficiency exists. The commissioner shall at once issue a written notice to the society requiring that the deficiency be corrected. After the notice the society has thirty (30) days in which to comply with the commissioner’s request for correction, and if the society fails to comply, the commissioner shall notify the society of findings of noncompliance and require the society to show cause on a date named why its license should not be suspended, revoked or refused. If on that date the society does not present a good and sufficient reason why its authority to do business in this state should not be suspended, revoked or refused, the commissioner may suspend or refuse the license of the society to do business in this state until satisfactory evidence is furnished to the commissioner that the suspension or refusal should be withdrawn or the commissioner may revoke the authority of the society to do business in this state.

Nothing contained in this section shall be taken or construed as preventing any society from continuing in good faith all contracts made in this state during the time such society was legally authorized to transact business herein.

In making the finding allowed by subsection (a) of this section, the commissioner may consider the factors specified in W.S. 26-3-116(c) and 26-3-132(a) and, upon finding a deficiency, may issue an order consistent with W.S. 26-3-132(b) and pursuant to the procedure established in W.S. 26-3-132(c).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1; 2016 ch. 24, § 2, effective March 3, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, added (d).

Laws 2016, ch. 24 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2016.

§ 26-29-232.
Injunction.

No application or petition for injunction against any domestic, foreign or alien society, or lodge thereof, shall be recognized in any court of this state unless made by the attorney general upon request of the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-233.
Licensing of agents.

Agents of societies shall be licensed in accordance with the provisions of the laws regulating the licensing, revocation, suspension or termination of license of resident and nonresident agents, provided that no examination shall be required of any agent licensed prior to the effective date of this act.

No examination or license shall be required of any regular salaried officer, employee or member of a licensed society who devotes substantially all of his services to activities other than the solicitation of fraternal insurance contracts from the public, and who receives for the solicitation of those contracts no commission or other compensation directly dependent upon the amount of business obtained.

Any agent or representative of a society who devotes, or intends to devote, less than fifty percent (50%) of his time to solicitation and procurement of insurance contracts for the society is exempt from the requirements of subsection (a) of this section. Any person who in the immediately preceding calendar year solicited and procured life insurance contracts on behalf of any society in an amount of insurance in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), or, in the case of any other kinds of insurance which the society writes, on the persons of more than ten (10) individuals and who received or will receive a commission or other compensation therefor, is presumed to be devoting or intending to devote, fifty percent (50%) of his time to the solicitation or procurement of insurance contracts for the society. The person shall report sales of insurance under this subsection as required by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-234.
Unfair methods of competition; unfair and deceptive acts and practices.

Every society authorized to do business in this state is subject to chapter 13 of title 26, the Unfair Trade Practices Act, provided, that nothing in that act shall be construed as applying to or affecting the right of any society to determine its eligibility requirements for membership, or be construed as applying to or affecting the offering of benefits exclusively to members or person eligible for membership in the society by a subsidiary corporation or affiliated organization of the society.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-235.
Service of process.

Every society authorized to do business in this state shall appoint in writing the commissioner to be its true and lawful attorney upon whom all lawful process in any action or proceeding against it shall be served, and shall agree in the writing that any lawful process against it which is served on the commissioner shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served upon the society, and that the authority shall continue in force so long as any liability remains outstanding in this state. Copies of the appointment, certified by the commissioner, shall be deemed sufficient evidence thereof and shall be admitted in evidence with the same force and effect as the original.

Service shall only be made upon the commissioner, or if absent, upon the person in charge of the commissioner’s office. It shall be made in duplicate and shall constitute sufficient service upon the society. When legal process against a society is served upon the commissioner, the commissioner shall forthwith forward one (1) of the duplicate copies by registered mail, prepaid, directed to the secretary or corresponding officer. No service shall require a society to file its answer, pleading or defense in less than thirty (30) days from the date of mailing the copy of the service to a society. Legal process shall not be served upon a society except in the manner herein provided. At the time of serving any process upon the commissioner, the plaintiff or complainant in the action shall pay to the commissioner a fee as provided in W.S.

26-4-101

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1; 2000, ch. 30, § 1.

§ 26-29-236.
Review.

All decisions and findings of the commissioner made under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to review by proper proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 26-29-237.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully makes a false or fraudulent statement in or relating to an application for membership or for the purpose of obtaining money from or a benefit in any society is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), or imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) days or more than one (1) year, or both.

Any person who willfully makes a false or fraudulent statement in any verified report or declaration under oath required or authorized by this chapter, or of any material fact or thing contained in a sworn statement concerning the death or disability of a member for that purpose of procuring payment of a benefit named in the certificate, is guilty of perjury punishable as provided by law.

Any person who solicits membership for, or in any manner assists in procuring membership in, any society not licensed to do business in this state, upon conviction, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) or more than two hundred dollars ($200.00).

Any person guilty of a willful violation of, or neglect or refusal to comply with this chapter for which a penalty is not otherwise prescribed, upon conviction is subject to the penalties provided by W.S.

26-1-107

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to perjury in judicial, legislative or administrative proceedings, see §

6-5-301

.

§ 26-29-238.
Exemption of certain societies.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be so construed as to affect or apply to:

Grand or subordinate lodges of societies, orders or associations now doing business in this state which provide benefits exclusively through local or subordinate lodges;

Orders, societies or associations which admit to membership only persons engaged in one (1) or more crafts or hazardous occupations, in the same or similar lines of business, insuring only their own members and their families, and the ladies’ societies or ladies’ auxiliaries to such orders, societies or associations;

Domestic societies which limit their membership to employees of a particular city or town, designated firm, business house or corporation which provide for a death benefit of not more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) or disability benefits of not more than three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) to any person in any one (1) year, or both; or

Domestic societies or associations of a purely religious, charitable or benevolent description, which provide for a death benefit of not more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) or for disability benefits of not more than three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) to any one (1) person in any one (1) year, or both.

Any society or association described in paragraph (a)(iii) or (iv) of this section which provides for death or disability benefits for which benefit certificates are issued, and any society or association included in paragraph (a)(iv) of this section which has more than one thousand (1,000) members, shall not be exempted from the provisions of this chapter but shall comply with all requirements thereof.

No society which, by the provisions of this section, is exempt from the requirements of this chapter, except any society described in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, shall give or allow, or promise to give or allow to any person any compensation for procuring new members.

Every society which provides for benefits in case of death or disability resulting solely from accident, and which does not obligate itself to pay natural death or sick benefits shall have all of the privileges and be subject to all the applicable provisions and regulations of this chapter except that the provisions relating to medical examination, valuations of benefit certificates, and incontestability, shall not apply to that society.

The commissioner may require from any society or association, by examination or otherwise, such information as will enable the commissioner to determine whether the society or association is exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

Societies, exempted under this section, shall also be exempt from all other provisions of the general insurance laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 184, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “paragraph” for “paragraphs.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 26-29-239.
Application of Wyoming Insurance Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure Act.

The Wyoming Insurance Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure Act, W.S.

26-54-101

through

26-54-108

, shall apply to domestic fraternal benefit societies regulated under this chapter.

History.

2018 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date.

—
Laws 2018, ch. 13, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.